tests/в.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Vowel harmony after ав":
    тав<n><abl> : тавдан
    тав<n><px3sp><dat> : тавуна
    тав<n><gen> : тавну
    тав<n><acc> : тавну
    тав<n><px3sp><nom> : таву

  "[twol] Vowel harmony after ев":
    оьлчев<n><abl> : оьлчевден
    оьлчев<n><dat> : оьлчевге
    оьлчев<n><px3sp><acc> : оьлчевюн
    оьлчев<n><gen> : оьлчевню
    тилев<n><abl> : тилевден
    тилев<n><dat> : тилевге
    тилев<n><px3sp><acc> : тилевюн
    тилев<n><gen> : тилевню

  "[twol] Vowel harmony after ив>, и>{I}в and front >{I}в":
    сезив<n><loc> : сезивде
    сезив<n><px3sp><nom> : сезивю
    сезив<n><acc> : сезивню
    бийи<v><tv><ger><loc> : бийивде
    бийи<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : бийивю
    бийи<v><tv><ger><acc> : бийивню
    чеч<v><tv><ger><loc> : чечивде
    чеч<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : чечивю
    чеч<v><tv><ger><acc> : чечивню

  "[twol] Vowel harmony after ыв>, {ы>{I}в} and back >{I}в":
    сатыв<n><loc> : сатывда
    сатыв<n><px3sp><nom> : сатыву
    сатыв<n><acc> : сатывну
    сат<v><tv><ger><loc> : сатывда
    сат<v><tv><ger><px3sp><nom> : сатыву
    сат<v><tv><ger><acc> : сатывну

  "[twol] Russian words with ев that don't cause rounding":
    Къадиев<np><cog><m><acc> : Къадиевни
    Акаев<np><cog><m><acc> : Акаевни
    Къадиев<np><cog><m><px3sp><acc> : Къадиевин
    Акаев<np><cog><m><px3sp><acc> : Акаевин
    состав<n><acc> : составны
    состав<n><px3sp><acc> : составын
    Муратов<np><cog><m><acc> : Муратовну
    Муратов<np><cog><m><px3sp><acc> : Муратовун

  "[twol] gerunds in яв":
    аркъатая<v><tv><ger><px3sp><acc> : аркъатаявун
    аркъатая<v><tv><ger><dat> : аркъатаявгъа

  "[twol] verb stems ending in п":
    тап<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : табулду
    тап<v><tv><gna_perf> : табып
    оьп<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : оьпдю
    оьп<v><tv><gna_perf> : оьбюп
    теп<v><tv><gna_perf> : тебип

  "[twol] verb stems ending in в":
    яв<v><iv><gna_perf> : явуп

  "[twol] noun stems ending in п":
    китап<n><px3sp><nom> : китабы
    гьисап<n><px3sp><nom> : гьисабы
    себеп<n><px3sp><nom> : себеби
    теп<n><px3sp><nom> : теби
